tr: Fren pabucu set içeriği: Komple fren pabucu kiti; Pabuçlar + ayar kiti; Pabuçlar + donanım kiti; Pabuçlar + yaylar; Yalnızca pabuçlar; Diğer
pt-BR: Conteúdo do conjunto de sapatas de freio: Kit completo de sapatas de freio; Sapatas + kit de ajuste; Sapatas + kit de ferragens; Sapatas + molas; Apenas sapatas; Outro
ru: Состав комплекта тормозных колодок: Полный комплект тормозных колодок; Колодки и комплект регуляторов; Колодки и крепежный комплект; Колодки и пружины; Только колодки; Другое
lt-LT: Stabdžių kaladėlių rinkinio turinys: Visas stabdžių trinkelių rinkinys; Trinkelės + reguliatoriaus rinkinys; Trinkelės + techninės įrangos rinkinys; Trinkelės + spyruoklės; Tik trinkelės; Kitas
zh-CN: 制动蹄套装内容: 完整刹车蹄套件; 刹车蹄 + 调节器套件; 刹车蹄 + 硬件套件; 刹车蹄 + 弹簧; 仅刹车蹄; 其他
nb: Bremseskosett innhold: Komplett bremsebåndsett; Bremsebånd + justeringssett; Bremsebånd + monteringssett; Bremsebånd + fjærer; Kun bremsebånd; Annet
el: Περιεχόμενα κιτ σιαγόνων φρένου: Πλήρες κιτ με σιαγόνες φρένων; Σιαγόνες + κιτ ρυθμιστή; Σιαγόνες + κιτ υλικού εξοπλισμού; Σιαγόνες + ελατήρια; Μόνο σιαγόνες; Άλλο
hr-HR: Sadržaj seta kočionih papučica: Potpuni komplet kočionih papuča; Papuče i komplet za podešavanje; Papuče i komplet opreme; Papuče i opruge; Samo papuče; Ostalo
vi: Nội dung bộ má phanh: Bộ guốc phanh hoàn chỉnh; Guốc phanh + bộ điều chỉnh; Guốc phanh + bộ phần cứng; Guốc phanh + lò xo; Chỉ guốc phanh; Khác
bg-BG: Съдържание на комплекта спирачни челюсти: Пълен комплект челюсти; Челюсти + комплект регулатори; Челюсти + комплект крепежни елементи; Челюсти + пружини; Само челюсти; Други
pl: Zawartość zestawu szczęk hamulcowych: Kompletny zestaw szczęk hamulcowych; Szczęki + zestaw regulatora; Szczęki + zestaw montażowy; Szczęki + sprężyny; Tylko szczęki; Inne
hu: Fékpofakészlet tartalma: Teljes fékpofakészlet; Fékpofák + állítókészlet; Fékpofák + rögzítőkészlet; Fékpofák + rugók; Csak fékpofák; Egyéb
da: Indhold i bremseklodssættet: Komplet bremsesæt (bremsebakker); Bakker og justeringssæt; Bakker og hardwaresæt; Bakker og fjedre; Kun bakker; Andet
ja: ブレーキシューセットコンテンツ: コンプリートブレーキシューキット; シューとアジャスターキット; シューと金具キット; シューとスプリング; シューのみ; その他
sk-SK: Obsah súpravy brzdových čeľustí: Kompletná súprava brzdových čeľustí; Čeľuste + súprava nastavovača; Čeľuste + súprava hardvéru; Čeľuste + pružiny; Len čeľuste; Iné
it: Contenuto del set di ganasce freno: Kit completo ganasce freno; Ganasce e kit regolatore; Ganasce e kit minuteria; Ganasce e molle; Solo ganasce; Altro
pt-PT: Conteúdo do conjunto de sapatas de travão: Kit completo de maxilas de travão; Maxilas + kit de ajuste; Maxilas + kit de acessórios; Maxilas + molas; Apenas maxilas; Outro
nl: Remschoen set inhoud: Complete remschoenenset; Schoenen + stelset; Schoenen + bevestigingsmateriaalset; Schoenen + veren; Alleen schoenen; Overig
ro-RO: Conținutul setului de saboți de frână: Kit complet de saboți de frână; Saboți + kit de reglare; Saboți + kit de accesorii; Saboți + arcuri; Doar saboți; Altele
cs: Obsah sady brzdových čelistí: Kompletní sada brzdových čelistí; Čelisti + seřizovací sada; Čelisti + sada hardwaru; Čelisti + pružiny; Pouze čelisti; Jiné
fr: Contenu du jeu de mâchoires de frein: Kit complet de mâchoires de frein; Mâchoires + kit de réglage; Mâchoires + kit de matériel; Mâchoires + ressorts; Mâchoires uniquement; Autre
sl-SI: Vsebina kompleta zavorne obloge: Celoten komplet zavornih čeljusti; Čeljusti in komplet nastavljalnikov; Čeljusti in komplet okovja; Čeljusti in vzmeti; Samo čeljusti; Drugo
en: Brake shoe set contents: Complete brake shoe kit; Shoes + adjuster kit; Shoes + hardware kit; Shoes + springs; Shoes only; Other
zh-TW: 煞車塊組內容物: 完整煞車蹄片套件; 蹄片 + 調整器套件; 蹄片 + 硬體套件; 蹄片 + 彈簧; 僅含蹄片; 其他
es: Contenido del juego de zapatas de freno: Kit completo de zapatas de freno; Zapatas y kit de ajustador; Zapatas y kit de hardware; Zapatas y resortes; Solo zapatas; Otro
sv: Innehåll av bromsbackssats: Komplett bromsbackskit; Bromsbackar + justeringskit; Bromsbackar + monteringsdetaljer; Bromsbackar + fjädrar; Endast bromsbackar; Övrigt
de: Inhalt des Bremsbacken-Sets: Komplettes Bremsbacken-Set; Bremsbacken + Nachsteller-Set; Bremsbacken + Zubehör-Set; Bremsbacken + Federn; Nur Bremsbacken; Sonstige
ko: 브레이크 슈 세트 구성품: 전체 브레이크 슈 키트; 슈 + 어저스터 키트; 슈 + 하드웨어 키트; 슈 + 스프링; 슈만; 기타
th: ส่วนประกอบที่มีให้ในชุดก้ามเบรกแบบดรัม: ชุดก้ามปูเบรกแบบครบชุด; ก้ามปูเบรก + ชุดปรับตั้ง; ก้ามปูเบรก + ชุดอุปกรณ์; ก้ามปูเบรก + สปริง; ก้ามปูเบรกเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
fi: Jarrukenkäsarjan sisältö: Täydellinen jarrukenkäsarja; Kengät ja säätösarja; Kengät ja asennustarvikesarja; Kengät ja jouset; Vain kengät; Muu